California, session 20252026, AB1616.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 709 is added to the Military and Veterans Code, to read:709. (a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the department shall establish a program to fund a study for nonnarcotic post-traumatic stress disorder treatments, including, but not limited to, hyperbaric oxygen therapy.(b) The department shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature, no later than June 30, 2030, that summarizes the findings and recommendations of the study pursuant to subdivision (a). The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________